Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1012
Owners of land outside of district; petition; contents.

Owners of land outside any district which can economically be served by the facilities of the district may petition to become attached to such district. Such petition for attachment shall be supported by signatures of landowners in the same manner as prescribed in section 46-1003. Such petition shall be filed with the county clerk addressed to the county board and shall define the boundaries of lands owned by the petitioners desired to be attached, and shall state (1) the name of the district to which attachment is desired; (2) that such lands are without an adequate water supply; and (3) that attachment to such district will be conducive to and will promote the public health, convenience and welfare.

Laws 1967, c. 279, § 12, p. 753;

Laws 1972, LB 1502, § 1.